California statutes. Business and Professions Code
21305.

This chapter applies with respect to equipment sold or in use on or after January 1, 2025.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 797, Sec. 1.   (SB 1384)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 9. Secondhand Goods [21500. - 21672.]



  ARTICLE 1. Watches [21500. - 21509.]

21500.

As used in this article:

(a) “Person” means an individual, firm, partnership, association, limited liability company, or corporation engaged in the business of selling watches.

(b) “Consumer” means an individual, firm, partnership, association or corporation who buys for his or her own use, or for the use of another, but not for resale.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1010, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

21501.

Except as provided in this article “secondhand watch” means any of the following:

(a) A watch which, as a whole, or the case thereof, or the movement thereof, has been sold to a consumer.

(b) Any watch whose case or movement, serial numbers or other distinguishing numbers or identification marks have been erased, defaced, removed, altered or covered.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 50.)
-------------------------------------------

21502.

A watch which is returned to the same person who sold the watch to the consumer, either through an exchange or for credit, within one year from the date of the original sale, if such seller keeps a written record of such sales, is not subject to the provisions of this article, unless the case, movement, serial number or other distinguishing identification marks have been removed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 50.)
-------------------------------------------

21503.

The written record referred to in this article shall contain all of the following information:

(a) The name and address of the consumer.

(b) The date of the sale to the consumer.

(c) The name of the watch or its maker.

(d) The serial number of the watch, if any, on its case or movement or any other distinguishing numbers or identification marks.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 50.)
-------------------------------------------

21504.

The written record referred to in this article shall be kept for at least three years from the date of the original sale of the watch. Such record shall be open for inspection during all business hours by the district attorney or his representative, of the county in which the vendor is engaged in business.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 50.)
-------------------------------------------

21505.

Any person who sells, exchanges, offers to sell or exchange, exposes for sale or exchange, or possesses with intent to sell or exchange, a secondhand watch, shall affix and keep affixed to the same a tag with the words “secondhand” legibly written or printed thereon in the English language.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 50.)
-------------------------------------------

21506.

Any person who sells a secondhand watch shall deliver to the vendee a written invoice setting forth the name and address of the vendor, the name and address of the vendee, the date of the sale, the name of the watch or its maker, and the serial numbers, if any, or other distinguishing numbers or identification marks on its case and movement. If the serial numbers, or other distinguishing numbers or identification marks have been erased, defaced, removed, altered or covered, this shall be set forth in the invoice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 50.)
-------------------------------------------

21507.

A duplicate of the invoice required by this article shall be kept on file by the vendor of the secondhand watch for at least one year from the date of the sale thereof and shall be open to inspection during all business hours by the district attorney, or his representative, of the county in which the vendor is engaged in business.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 50.)
-------------------------------------------

21508.

Any person advertising in any manner secondhand watches for sale shall state clearly in such advertising that the watches so advertised are secondhand watches.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 50.)
-------------------------------------------

21509.

Violation of this article is a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 50.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Builders’ Tools [21550. - 21556.]

21550.

“Person” as used in this article includes firm and corporation.

“Builders’ tools” as used in this chapter includes all tools customarily used in the construction, alteration, or repair of buildings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 50.)
-------------------------------------------

21551.

Every person dealing in secondhand goods, wares or merchandise, either as pawnbroker or otherwise, who buys or receives as a pledge any builders’ tools shall keep a register in which shall be entered all of the following:

(a) The place, date and hour of the sale or pledge of any such tools.

(b) The name, address and description of the seller or pledgor.

(c) A description of the tools, including all numbers, letters, names and other identification marks appearing thereon.

(d) The name and address of the individual to whom such tools were sold or pledged.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 50.)
-------------------------------------------

21552.

Whenever any person referred to in this article ships or otherwise transmits any builders’ tools bought or received as a pledge, to any place outside the county in which the tools were so bought or so received, such person shall enter in the register required to be kept by this article the date on which such tools were shipped or otherwise transmitted, and the name and the place of business or residence of the person to whom such tools were so shipped or transmitted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 50.)
-------------------------------------------

21553.

Every person referred to in this article shall each day, except legal holidays, deliver a full, true and complete copy of the register required to be kept by this article to the chief of police, city marshal, town marshal, or other head of the police department of the city, city and county, town, or other municipality or district wherein such builders’ tools were bought or received in pledge.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 50.)
-------------------------------------------

21554.

The report shall include references to all builders’ tools bought or received as a pledge or shipped or otherwise transmitted since the preceding report.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 50.)
-------------------------------------------

21555.

If there is no police department in the municipality or district in which builders’ tools are bought or received in pledge, or from which they are shipped or otherwise transmitted, the report required by this article shall be delivered or mailed each day, except legal holidays, to the sheriff of the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 50.)
-------------------------------------------

21556.

Any person who violates this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 50.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Junk [21600. - 21610.]

21600.

As used in this article, “junk” means any and all secondhand and used machinery and all ferrous and nonferrous scrap metals and alloys, including any and all secondhand and used furniture, pallets, or other personal property, other than livestock, or parts or portions thereof.

As used in this section, “scrap metals and alloys” includes, but is not limited to, materials and equipment commonly used in construction, agricultural operations and electrical power generation, railroad equipment, oil well rigs, nonferrous materials, stainless steel, and nickel which are offered for sale to any junk dealer or recycler, but does not include scrap iron, household generated waste, or aluminum beverage containers, as defined in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 14502) of Division 12.1 of the Public Resources Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 60, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

21601.

As used in this article, “junk dealer” includes any person engaged in the business of buying, selling and dealing in junk, any person purchasing, gathering, collecting, soliciting or traveling about from place to place procuring junk, and any person operating, carrying on, conducting or maintaining a junk yard or place where junk is gathered together and stored or kept for shipment, sale or transfer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 1078.)
-------------------------------------------

21602.

As used in this article, “junk yard” includes any yard, plot, space, inclosure, building or any other place where junk is collected, stored, gathered together and kept.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 1078.)
-------------------------------------------

21603.

This article shall not apply to any of the following:

(a) Secondhand furniture merchants.

(b) Pawnbrokers.

(c) Secondhand car dealers or merchants in connection with automobile and motor vehicle sales agencies but not carried on and conducted in conjunction with a junk yard.

(d) Persons engaged in the business of selling new automobile tires or batteries or other equipment taking in part payment used articles of the same kind and thereafter selling or disposing of the same.

(e) Secondhand oil well supply and equipment dealers not conducting or carrying on their business in connection with a junk yard.

(f) Secondhand clothing merchants and ragpickers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 1078.)
-------------------------------------------

21604.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, this article does not apply to:

(a) Any person who buys or sells junk acquired in the conduct of any business other than that of a junk dealer or recycler.

(b) Except as provided in Section 21609.1, those purchases of scrap metal by a junk dealer or recycler when the payment for the scrap metal is by check issued to the company represented as being the owner of the scrap.

(c) Scrap metal purchased or received from another junk dealer or recycler who has recorded, reported, and held the material as required. The purchase or receipt
 shall also be exempt from further holding or reporting provided that the selling party gives the buyer written assurance of this fact. The seller shall be held responsible for any failure to report or hold.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 656, Sec. 2.   (SB 1387)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

21605.

(a) Every junk dealer and every recycler in this state is hereby required to keep a written record of all sales and purchases made in the course of his or her business.

(b) For purposes of this article, “recycler” means any processor, recycling center, or noncertified recycler, as those terms are defined in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 14502) of Division 12.1 of the Public Resources Code, who buys or sells scrap metal that constitutes junk, as defined in Section 21600.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1288, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

21606.

(a) Every junk dealer and every recycler shall set out in the written record required by this article all of the following:

(1) The place, date, time, and amount paid of each sale or purchase of junk made in the conduct of their business as a junk dealer or recycler and the name of the employee handling the transaction.

(2) One of the following methods of identification:

(A) The name, valid driver’s license number, and state of issue or California- or United States-issued identification card number.

(B) The
 name, identification number, and country of issue from a passport used for identification and the address from an additional item of identification that also bears the seller’s name.

(C) The name and identification number from a Matricula Consular used for identification and the address from an additional item of identification that also bears the seller’s name.

(3) The vehicle license number, including the state of issue, of any motor vehicle used in transporting the junk to the junk dealer’s or recycler’s place of business.

(4) The name and address of each person to whom junk is sold or disposed of, and the license number of any motor vehicle used in transporting the junk from the junk dealer’s or recycler’s place of
 business.

(5) A description of the item or items of junk purchased or sold, including the item type, weight, identifying marks engraved or etched on the metal, if any and readily visible, and serial numbers, if any and readily visible.

(6) A signed statement indicating either that the seller of the junk is the owner of it, or the name of the person the
 seller obtained the junk from, as shown on a signed transfer document.

(b) Any person who makes, or causes to be made, any false or fictitious statement regarding any information required by this section, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(c) Every junk dealer and every recycler shall report the information required in subdivision (a) to the chief of police or to the sheriff in the same manner as described in Section 21628.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 694, Sec. 1.   (AB 476)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

21606.5.

Every junk dealer or recycler shall, during normal business hours, allow periodic inspection of any premises maintained and any junk thereon for the purpose of determining compliance with the recordkeeping requirements of this article, and shall during those hours produce his or her records of sales and purchases, except as provided in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 21608.5, and all property purchased incident to those transactions which is in the possession of the junk dealer or recycler for inspection by any of the following persons:

(a) An officer holding a warrant authorizing him or her to search for personal property.

(b) A person appointed by
 the sheriff of a county or appointed by the head of the police department of a city.

(c) An officer holding a court order directing him or her to examine the records or property.

(d) The amendments to this section made by the act adding this subdivision shall become operative on December 1, 2008.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 78, Sec. 1.   (AB 85)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

21607.

Every junk dealer and recycler shall preserve the written record required by this article for at least two years after making the final entry of any purchase or sale of junk or scrap metals and alloys as defined in Section 21600.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1288, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

21608.

(a) A junk dealer or recycler who fails in any respect to keep the written record required by this article, or to set out in that written record any matter required by this article to be set out therein, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

Every junk dealer or recycler who refuses, upon demand pursuant to Section 21606.5, to exhibit the written record required by this article, or who destroys that record within two years after making the final entry of a purchase or sale of junk therein, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(b) Any knowing and willful violation of subdivision (a) shall be punishable as follows:

(1) For a first offense, by a fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by imprisonment in the county jail for not less than 30 days, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(2) For a second offense, by a fine of not less than two thousand dollars ($2,000), or by imprisonment in the county jail for not less than 30 days, or by both that fine and imprisonment. In addition to any other sentence imposed pursuant to this paragraph, the court may order the defendant to stop engaging in business as a junk dealer or recycler for a period not to exceed 30 days.

(3) For a third or any subsequent offense, by a fine of not less than four thousand dollars ($4,000), or by imprisonment in the county jail for not less than six months, or by both that fine and imprisonment. In addition to any other sentence imposed pursuant to this paragraph, the court shall order the defendant to stop engaging in business as a junk dealer or recycler for not less than one year.

(c) The amendments to this section made by the act adding this subdivision shall become operative on December 1, 2008.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 731, Sec. 3.   Effective September 30, 2008.   Amended version operative December 1, 2008, pursuant to immediate operation of new subdivision (c).)
-------------------------------------------

21608.3.

(a) Any unauthorized disclosure of personal identification information collected from a seller by a junk dealer or recycler is prohibited, and any such disclosure shall render the violator liable for a civil fine of up to five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(b) This section shall become operative on December 1, 2008.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 730, Sec. 4.   Effective September 30, 2008.   Section operative December 1, 2008, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

21608.5.

(a) A junk dealer or recycler in this state shall not provide payment for nonferrous material unless, in addition to meeting the written record requirements of Sections 21605 and 21606, all of the following requirements are met:

(1) (A) The payment for the material is made by cash, general use prepaid card, or check. The check may be mailed to the seller at the address provided pursuant to paragraph (3), or the cash or check may be collected by the seller from the junk dealer or recycler on or after the third business day after the date of sale. If the buyer offers, and the seller agrees, to have the payment made by general use prepaid card, the card may be provided
 to the seller at the time of sale, but funds shall not be available to the seller until the third business day after the date of sale.

(B) If payment is made by general use prepaid card, a junk dealer or recycler shall pay any one-time initial issuance fee.

(C) A general use prepaid card used pursuant to this section shall allow for reasonably convenient access to a surcharge-free cash access network location, and the junk dealer or recycler shall inform the seller as to the location of a designated surcharge-free cash access location upon issuance of the card.

(D) Nothing in this section shall prevent or regulate the fees or surcharges charged by a bank or credit
 union that is not a party to the contract that requires payment to be made by a general use prepaid card.

(2) At the time of sale, the junk dealer or recycler obtains a clear photograph or video of the seller.

(3) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), the junk dealer or recycler obtains a copy of the valid driver’s license of the seller containing a photograph and an address of the seller, a copy of a state or federal government-issued identification card containing a photograph and an address of the seller, a passport from any other country in addition to another item of identification bearing an address of the seller, or a Matricula Consular in addition to another item of identification bearing an address of the seller.

(B) If the seller prefers to have the check or general use prepaid card with payment for the material mailed to an alternative address, other than a post office box, the junk dealer or recycler shall obtain a copy of a driver’s license or identification card described in subparagraph (A), and a gas or electric utility bill addressed to the seller at that alternative address with a payment due date no more than two months prior to the date of sale. For purposes of this paragraph, “alternative address” means an address that is different from the address appearing on the seller’s driver’s license or identification card.

(4) The junk dealer or recycler obtains a clear photograph or video of the nonferrous material being purchased.

(5) The junk dealer or recycler shall preserve the information obtained pursuant to this subdivision for a period of two years after the date of sale.

(6) (A) The junk dealer or recycler obtains a thumbprint of the seller, as prescribed by the Department of Justice. The junk dealer or recycler shall keep this thumbprint with the information obtained under this subdivision and shall preserve the thumbprint in either hardcopy or electronic format for a period of two years after the date of sale.

(B) Inspection or seizure of the thumbprint shall only be performed by a peace officer acting within the scope of the peace officer’s authority in response to a criminal search warrant signed by a magistrate and served on the junk dealer or recycler by the peace
 officer. Probable cause for the issuance of that warrant shall be based upon a theft specifically involving the transaction for which the thumbprint was given.

(b) Paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall not apply if, during any three-month period commencing on or after the effective date of this section, the junk dealer or recycler completes five or more separate transactions per month, on five or more separate days per month, with the seller and, in order for paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) to continue to be inapplicable, the seller shall continue to complete five or more separate transactions per month with the junk dealer or recycler.

(c) This section shall not apply if, on the date of sale, the junk dealer or recycler has on file or receives all of the following information:

(1) The name, physical business address, and business telephone number of the seller’s business.

(2) The business license number or tax identification number of the seller’s business.

(3) A copy of the valid driver’s license of the person delivering the nonferrous material on behalf of the seller to the junk dealer or the recycler.

(d) (1) This section shall not apply to the purchase of nonferrous material having a value of not more than twenty dollars ($20) in a single transaction, when the majority of the transaction is for the redemption of beverage containers under the California Beverage Container Recycling and Litter Reduction
 Act, as set forth in Division 12.1 (commencing with Section 14500) of the Public Resources Code.

(2) Materials made of copper or copper alloys shall not be purchased under this subdivision.

(e) This section shall not apply to coin dealers or to automobile dismantlers, as defined in Section 220 of the Vehicle Code.

(f) For purposes of this section, “designated surcharge-free cash access network location” means a location designated, in a contract
 between a junk dealer or recycler and a card issuer, as a location where a general use prepaid card holder can withdraw cash without paying a surcharge.

(g) For purposes of this section, “general use prepaid card” has the same meaning as “prepaid account” in Section 1005.2 of Title 12 of the Code of Federal Regulations as it read on April 1, 2019, except that a general use prepaid card does not include a card for which any of the following fees are charged by the card issuer to the card user:

(1) A fee or surcharge to make a purchase with the card.

(2) A fee or surcharge to make a balance inquiry.

(3) A fee or surcharge to withdraw funds at a
 designated surcharge-free cash access network location.

(4) A fee or surcharge to lodge a dispute regarding the balance of funds on the card.

(5) A fee or surcharge for account inactivity.

(h) For the purposes of this section, “nonferrous material” means copper, copper alloys, stainless steel, or aluminum, but does not include beverage containers, as defined in Section 14505 of the Public Resources Code, that are subject
 to a redemption payment pursuant to Section 14560 of the Public Resources Code.

(i) This section is intended to occupy the entire field of law related to junk dealer or recycler transactions involving nonferrous material. However, a city or county ordinance, or a city and county ordinance, relating to the subject matter of this section is not in conflict with this section if the ordinance is passed by a two-thirds vote and it can be demonstrated by clear and convincing evidence that the ordinance is both necessary and addresses a unique problem within and specific to the jurisdiction of the ordinance that cannot effectively be addressed under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 243, Sec. 1.   (SB 143)   Effective September 5, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

21608.6.

(a) A junk dealer or recycler, as defined in subdivision (f), in this state shall not provide payment for newspaper, as defined in Section 538c of the Penal Code, or for California Redemption Value (CRV) containers unless, in addition to meeting the written record requirements of Sections 21605 and 21606, all of the following requirements are met:

(1) The payment for the newspaper or for the CRV containers is made by check or by other electronic transfer from the junk dealer or recycler to the seller. A recycler, if authorized by regulations adopted pursuant to Division 12.1 (commencing with Section 14500) of the Public Resources Code, may provide payment for CRV containers through a voucher that is immediately redeemable for cash.

(2) The junk dealer or recycler obtains and records a valid, documented address for the seller by obtaining a copy of the valid driver’s license of the seller containing a photograph and an address of the seller, or a copy of a state or federal government-issued identification card containing a photograph and an address of the seller, or other valid identification containing the seller’s address, such as utility bills in the seller’s name. The junk dealer or recycler shall preserve the photograph and the address or the copies obtained pursuant to this paragraph for a period of two years after the date of sale.

(b) The requirements of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall not apply if, during any three-month period commencing on or after the effective date of this section, the junk dealer or recycler completes five or more separate transactions per month with the seller, and in order for the requirements of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) to continue to be inapplicable, the seller must continue to complete five or more separate transactions per month with the junk dealer or recycler.

(c) This section shall not apply if, on the date of sale, the junk dealer or recycler has on file or receives all of the following information:

(1) The name, physical business address, and business telephone number of the seller’s business.

(2) The business license number or tax identification number of the seller’s business.

(3) A copy of the valid driver’s license or a copy of a state or federal government-issued identification card containing a photograph and an address of the person delivering newspaper or CRV containers on behalf of the seller to the junk dealer or the recycler.

(d) Any unauthorized disclosure of personal identification information collected from a seller by a junk dealer or recycler is prohibited, and any violation of this prohibition is subject to a civil fine not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(e) This section shall not apply to the payment for newspaper having a value of fifty dollars ($50) or less in a single transaction or CRV containers having a value of one hundred dollars ($100) or less in a single transaction.

(f) This section shall only apply in jurisdictions that offer curbside pickup of materials that include newspaper and CRV containers.

(g) Notwithstanding Section 21605, for purposes of this section, “recycler” means any processor, recycling center, or noncertified recycler, as those terms are defined in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 14502) of Division 12.1 of the Public Resources Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 733, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

21608.7.

(a) A junk dealer or recycler shall request to receive theft alert notifications regarding the theft of commodity metals, including, but not limited to, ferrous metal, copper, brass, aluminum, nickel, stainless steel, and alloys, in the junk dealer’s or recycler’s geographic region from the theft alert system maintained by the Institute of Scrap Recycling Industries, Inc., or its successor.

(b) The requirement in subdivision (a) does not apply if the institute or its successor requires payment for use of the
 theft alert system.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 608, Sec. 3.   (AB 2312)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

21609.

(a) Whenever a peace officer has probable cause to believe that property in the possession of a junk dealer or recycler is stolen, in lieu of seizing the property, the peace officer as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 21606.5, at his or her option, may place a hold on the property for a period not to exceed 90 days. When a peace officer places a hold on the property, the peace officer shall give the junk dealer or recycler a written notice at the time the hold is placed, describing the item or items to be held plus the case number. During that period the junk dealer or recycler shall not release or dispose of the property, except pursuant to a court order or upon receipt of a written authorization signed by a peace officer who is a member of the law enforcement agency of which the peace officer placing the hold on the property is a member. Except as specifically set forth in this section, a junk dealer or recycler shall not be subject to civil liability for compliance with this section.

(b) Whenever property that is in the possession of a junk dealer or recycler is subject to a hold and the property is required by a peace officer in a criminal investigation, the junk dealer or recycler, upon reasonable notice, shall produce the property at reasonable times and places or may deliver the property to any peace officer upon the request of any peace officer who is a member of the law enforcement agency of which the peace officer placing the hold on the property is a member.

(c) Whenever property that is in the possession of a junk dealer or recycler is subject to a hold and the property is no longer required for the purpose of criminal investigation, the law enforcement agency that placed the hold on the property shall undertake the following:

(1) With respect to the property being held, if the law enforcement agency has no knowledge of the property on hold being reported as stolen, the property shall be released upon written notice to the junk dealer or recycler. The notice shall be provided in a timely fashion.

(2) If the law enforcement agency has knowledge that the property has been reported stolen, the law enforcement agency shall notify the person who reported the stolen property of the name and address of the junk dealer or recycler holding the property and authorize the release of the property to that person.

The law enforcement agency that placed the property on hold shall release the hold after 60 days has elapsed following the delivery of the notice to the person who reported the property stolen.

(3) If a victim seeks to recover property that is subject to a hold, the junk dealer or recycler shall advise the victim of the name and badge number of the peace officer who placed the hold on the property and the name of the law enforcement agency of which the officer is a member. If the property is not required to be held pursuant to a criminal prosecution the hold shall be released.

(d) Upon conviction of a person for the theft of property placed on hold pursuant to this section, the court shall order the defendant to do both of the following:

(1) Pay the junk dealer or recycler reasonable costs for the storage of the property.

(2) Pay the victim for both the value of the property stolen and any reasonable collateral damage caused in the commission of the theft.

(e) The amendments to this section made by the act adding this subdivision shall become operative on December 1, 2008.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 731, Sec. 6.   Effective September 30, 2008.   Amended version operative December 1, 2008, pursuant to immediate operation of new subdivision (e).)
-------------------------------------------

21609.1.

(a) A junk dealer or recycler shall not possess any
 of the following material that was owned or previously owned by an agency, in the absence of a written certification on the letterhead of the agency owning or previously owning the material described in the certification that the agency has either sold the material described or is offering the material for sale, salvage, or recycling, and that the person possessing the certification and identified in the certification is authorized to negotiate the sale of that material:

(1) A fire hydrant or any reasonably recognizable part of a fire hydrant.

(2) A fire department connection, including, but not limited to, reasonably recognizable bronze or brass fittings and parts.

(3) A maintenance hole cover or lid or
 reasonably recognizable part of a maintenance hole cover or lid.

(4) Backflow devices and connections to that device, or any part of that device.

(5) Reasonably recognizable street lights, traffic signals, and their reasonably recognizable related equipment, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Controller devices.

(B) Light-emitting diode (LED) fixtures.

(C) Ornamental or historical, modern, or pedestrian poles made of concrete, steel, brass, cast iron, or aluminum.

(D) Solar street lighting components, such as solar
 panels, steel
 poles, and battery packs.

(E) Colocation equipment.

(F) Conductors, wiring, and cabling, including fiber optic cables.

(G) Cameras.

(H) Air quality sensors.

(I) Digital banners and signs.

(J) Pedestrian and cycling counters.

(6) Active grade crossing signals.

(7) Sewer flow monitoring station equipment.

(8) Sewer pump station instrumentation and
 controls.

(9) Stormwater auto sampling equipment and instrumentation.

(10) Stormwater pump station instrumentation and controls.

(11) Irrigation wiring.

(12) Plaques.

(13) Communications or broadband infrastructure or equipment.

(14) Electric vehicle chargers.

(15) Water meters and water meter components.

(b) A junk dealer or recycler who unknowingly takes possession of one or more of the items listed in subdivision (a) as part
 of a load of otherwise nonprohibited materials without a written certification has a duty to notify the appropriate law enforcement agency by the end of the next business day upon discovery of the prohibited material. Written certification shall relieve the junk dealer or recycler from any civil or criminal penalty for possession of the prohibited material. The prohibited material shall be set aside and not sold pending a determination made by a law enforcement agency pursuant to Section 21609.

(c) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Agency” means a public agency, city, county, city and county, special district, or private utility regulated by the Public Utilities Commission.

(2) “Appropriate law enforcement agency” means either of the following:

(A) The police chief of the city, or their designee, if the item or items listed in subdivision (a) are located within the territorial limits of an incorporated city.

(B) The sheriff of the county or their designee if the item or items listed are located within the county but outside the territorial limits of an incorporated city.

(3) “Written certification” means a certification in written form by the junk dealer or recycler to a law enforcement agency, including electronic mail, facsimile, or a letter delivered in person or by certified mail.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 694, Sec. 2.   (AB 476)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

21609.5.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), no junk dealer or recycler may purchase or receive refillable stainless steel or aluminum alloy beer kegs marked with an indicia of ownership from any person or entity other than the indicated owner. For purposes of this section, “indicia of ownership” means words, symbols, or registered trademarks printed, stamped, etched, attached, or otherwise displayed on the exterior surface of the beer keg that reasonably identifies the owner.

(b) If the seller is not the indicated owner, a junk dealer or recycler may purchase or receive refillable stainless steel or aluminum alloy beer kegs only if the seller or transferor provides a receipt from the indicated owner verifying the seller’s current ownership or a document indicating that the seller or transferor is authorized by the indicated owner to sell or transfer the beer kegs. Copies of these documents shall be maintained by the junk dealer or recycler as part of the written record of the transaction.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 349, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

21609.7.

(a) Except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (d), a junk dealer or recycler shall not purchase bulk merchandise pallets marked with an indicia of ownership from any person or entity other than the indicated owner.

(b) (1) If the seller is not the indicated owner, a junk dealer or recycler may purchase bulk merchandise pallets if the seller provides one of the following:

(A) A receipt from the indicated owner verifying the seller’s current ownership.

(B) A document indicating that the seller is authorized by the indicated owner to sell the
 merchandise pallets.

(2) Copies of these documents shall be maintained by the junk dealer or recycler as part of the written record of the transaction.

(c) For a single purchase transaction involving five or more bulk merchandise pallets marked with indicia of ownership where the seller is not the indicated owner, the junk dealer or recycler shall make payment only by a check mailed to the address shown on the driver’s license or other government-issued photo identification provided by the seller or by cash or check collected by the seller on or after the third business day following the date of the transaction.

(d) Nothing in this section prohibits a junk dealer or recycler from acquiring good faith possession of
 merchandise pallets based on the representations of the seller that the indicated owner cannot be located or has failed to retrieve the merchandise pallets on a timely basis. If the indicated owner can be located, a junk dealer or recycler who acquires good faith possession shall give notice of good faith possession to the indicated owner of the merchandise pallets. The seller shall retain a copy of this notice of good faith possession for at least two years. A junk dealer or recycler who acquires good faith possession may require payment of reasonable storage fees for the merchandise pallets if the indicated owner demands a return within 35 calendar days after the junk dealer or recycler notifies the indicated owner of having acquired good faith possession. After 35 calendar
 days from when the junk dealer or recycler provides notice of good faith possession to the indicated owner, the owner shall be deemed to have relinquished possession of the merchandise pallets, at which time the junk dealer or recycler may either sell the pallets or charge reasonable storage fees if the indicated owner demands a return and the pallets are still in the possession of the junk dealer or recycler.
